Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3509
Plaintiff's privacy.

In any action brought pursuant to the Uniform Civil Remedies for Unauthorized Disclosure of Intimate Images Act, a plaintiff may request to use a pseudonym instead of his or her legal name in all court proceedings and records. Upon finding that the use of a pseudonym is proper, the court shall ensure that the pseudonym is used in all court proceedings and records.

Laws 2019, LB680, § 9.

Uniform Civil Remedies for Unauthorized Disclosure of Intimate Images Act, see section 25-3501.